Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-104.01
Commissioner; salary increase; when effective.

Section 75-104 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose, to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation as therein provided for public service commissioners, and to permit a change in such salaries as soon as the same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 477, § 2, p. 1474.